Utah statutes.
59-2-909.   Time for adoption of levy -- County purpose requirement.

The county legislative body of each county shall adopt a proposed or, if the tax rate is not more than the certified tax rate, a final tax rate on the taxable property of the county before June 22 to provide funds for county purposes.

